Hawaii, session 2025, HB1332.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that beaches are among the most treasured natural and cultural resources in the State.  From their scenic beauty to their ecological importance, Hawaii's beaches play a vital role in the lives of residents and visitors.  However, these iconic coastal areas face numerous challenges, including erosion, pollution, and overuse. The legislature further finds that an annual day of celebration and observance would raise awareness about environmental stewardship, encourage responsible beach use, and highlight the ecological and cultural significance of Hawaii's coastal areas.  Therefore, the purpose of this Act is to establish an annual Hawaii Beach Day to celebrate, promote, and protect Hawaii's beaches. SECTION 2.  Chapter 8, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§8-     Hawaii Beach Day.  (a)  August 30 of each year shall be known and designated as "Hawaii Beach Day".  This day is not and shall not be construed to be a state holiday. (b)  Hawaii Beach Day shall serve the following purposes: (1)  Promote public awareness about the importance of preserving and protecting Hawaii's beaches; (2)  Celebrate the cultural and recreational value of beaches to Hawaii's residents and visitors; (3)  Encourage participation in beach cleanups and environmental conservation initiatives; and (4)  Highlight sustainable tourism practices to minimize the environmental impact of beach use." SECTION 3.  Chapter 201B, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§201B-     Hawaii Beach Day.  (a) The authority, in collaboration with the department of land and natural resources, shall organize and support events and activities to celebrate and observe Hawaii Beach Day, established by section 8-   , including: (1)  Statewide beach cleanups and restoration projects; (2)  Educational campaigns about marine conservation and beach stewardship; (3)  Cultural demonstrations and workshops about the historical and cultural significance of beaches in Native Hawaiian traditions; and (4)  Public art or educational exhibits that highlight the beauty and importance of Hawaii's beaches. (b) The authority shall encourage schools, community organizations, and local businesses to participate in the celebration and observation of Hawaii Beach Day by conducting events, workshops, and campaigns that align with the goals of Hawaii Beach Day. (c)  No later than twenty days before the convening of each regular session, the authority shall submit an annual report to the legislature detailing, at a minimum: (1)  The events and activities conducted to promote Hawaii Beach Day; (2)  The funds expended by the authority regarding Hawaii Beach Day and the outcomes of those expenditures; and (3)  Recommendations for improving future celebrations and observances of Hawaii Beach Day." SECTION 4.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the Hawaii tourism authority, in collaboration with the department of land and natural resources, to organize and support events and activities to celebrate and observe Hawaii Beach Day, established by section 8-   , Hawaii Revised Statutes, including: (1)  Conducting marketing and public-awareness campaigns; (2)  Obtaining equipment and supplies for beach cleanups and conservation efforts; and (3)  Making grants to community organizations for events related to Hawaii Beach Day. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the Hawaii tourism authority for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 5.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 6.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval; provided that section 4 of this Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________